test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s8_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - bekenna: # 
    bekenna+V+Inf: bekenna
    bekenna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bekennir
    bekenna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bekendi
    bekenna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bekendu
    bekenna+V+Sup: bekent
    bekenna+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bekendur

  Verb - brenna: # 
    brenna+V+Inf: brenna
    brenna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: brennir
    brenna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: brendi
    brenna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: brendu
    brenna+V+Sup: brent
    brenna+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: brendur

  Verb - brynna: # 
    brynna+V+Inf: brynna
    brynna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: brynnir
    brynna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bryndi
    brynna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bryndu
    brynna+V+Sup: brynt
    brynna+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bryndur
